Wyoming, session 2025, SF0182.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 39-11-101(a)(vi) and 39-11-102(c)(xv)
are amended to read:

39-11-101. Definitions.

(a) As used in this act unless otherwise specifically
provided:
SF0182

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0769

(vi) "Fair market value" means:

(A) For land, the amount in cash, or terms
reasonably equivalent to cash, a well informed buyer is
justified in paying for a property and a well informed
seller is justified in accepting, assuming neither party to
the transaction is acting under undue compulsion, and
assuming the property has been offered in the open market
for a reasonable time, except, fair market value of
agricultural land shall be determined as provided by W.S.
39-13-103(b)(x); and fair market value of

(B) For personal property and for
appurtenances, including structures, affixed to land, the
replacement cost new of the property, less depreciation;

(C) For mine products, fair market value
shall be determined as provided by W.S. 39-14-103(b),
39-14-203(b), 39-14-303(b), 39-14-403(b), 39-14-503(b),
39-14-603(b) and 39-14-703(b).;

SF0182

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0769
39-11-102. Administration; confidentiality;
department of revenue.

(c) In addition to the other powers and duties
imposed by law, the department shall:

(xv) Prescribe the system of establishing
manuals, formulas, methods or systems required to establish
the fair market value of all property valued for property
taxation to ensure that all property within a class is
uniformly valued. The county assessor and the facilities of
his office, together with the deputy assessors and clerical
assistants in each county, at the direction of the
department, shall give full aid in the installation of the
any prescribed system in the county. The county shall also
furnish the necessary supplies and records for installing
the any system under this paragraph;

Section 2. The department of revenue shall adopt
rules necessary to implement this act not later than
January 1, 2026.

SF0182

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0769
Section 3.

(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective immediately upon completion
of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided
by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution.

(b) Section 1 of this act is effective January 1,
2026.

(END)
SF0182